North Dakota, session 69, HB1218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 61-02-01.3 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
61-02-01.3. Comprehensive water development plan.
1. Biennially, the commission shall develop and maintain a comprehensive water development
plan organized on a river basin perspective, including an inventory of future water projects for
budgeting and planning purposes.
2. As part of the commission's planning process, to facilitate local project sponsor participation
and project prioritization and to assist in education regarding life cycle analyses for municipal
water supply projects, and economic analyses for flood control and water conveyance projects
expected to cost more than one million dollars, the commission shall develop a policy that
outlines procedures for commissioner-hosted meetings within the upper Missouri River, lower
Missouri River, James River, upper Red River, lower Red River, Mouse River, Devils Lake,
Little Missouri River, upper Heart River, and upper Cannonball River drainage basins.
3. The commission may not require an economic analysis for an assessment drain project if the
project is expected to cost one million dollars or less.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 61-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Economic analysis for assessment drain projects - Moratorium .
Notwithstanding section 61 - 02 - 01.3, between Augus t 1, 2025, and July 31, 2027, the state water
commission or the department of water resources may not conduct an economic analysis for an
assessment drain project within the state.
SECTION 3. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - FORMULA FOR ECONOMIC ANALYSIS
FOR ASSESSMENT DRAIN PROJECTS. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall
study the formula for conducting an economic analysis for assessment drain projects and the projected
cost threshold for conducting economic analyses. The legislative management shall report its findings
and recommendations, together with any legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the
seventieth legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. EXPIRATION DATE. Section 2 of this Act is effective through July 31, 2027, and after
that date is ineffective.

H. B. NO. 1218 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1218.
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 1 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 41 Nays 6 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State